Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 12.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201271-4835
Search and notification.

(a)
The following persons shall make a reasonable search of an individual who
the person reasonably believes is dead or near death for a document of gift
or other information identifying the individual as a donor or as an individual
who made a refusal:

(1)
A law enforcement officer, firefighter, paramedic, or other emergency rescuer
finding the individual; and

(2) If no other source of the information
is immediately available, a hospital, as soon as practical after the individual's
arrival at the hospital.

(b) If a document of gift or a refusal
to make an anatomical gift is located by the search required by subdivision
(a)(1) of this section and the individual or deceased individual to whom it
relates is taken to a hospital, the person responsible for conducting the
search shall send the document of gift or refusal to the hospital.

(c)
A person is not subject to criminal or civil liability for failing to discharge
the duties imposed by this section but may be subject to administrative sanctions.

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 12.